South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S56.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 27-37-100 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 27-37-100. (A) If the verdict be for the plaintiff the magistrate shall within five days issue a writ of ejectment and the tenant shall be ejected by the constable or special constable or the sheriff of the county. (B) The judge may seal the writ of ejectment such that it does not become a public record negatively affecting the tenant's credit worthiness. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----